South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S409.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the State Board of Financial Institutions, relating to Terms and Conditions for State-chartered Credit Unions to Make ARM Loans, designated as Regulation Document Number 5293, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State Board of Financial Institutions (BOFI) proposes to repeal Regulation 15-51 as current state law allows greater flexibility. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. The Proposed Regulation was published in the State Register on August 23, 2024. ----XX----